District of Columbia statutes.
1-1204

Seal.

Each notary public shall provide a notarial seal with which he shall authenticate all his official acts.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1279, ch. 854, § 562

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-804.
1973 Ed., § 1-505.